North Dakota, session 69, HB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 43-37-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. "Audiology" means the application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement,
testing, evaluation, prediction, consultation, counseling, instruction, habilitation, or
rehabilitation related to hearing and disorders of hearing including vestibular testing, for the
purpose of evaluating, identifying, managing, preventing, ameliorating, or modifying such
disorders and conditions in individuals or groups of individuals.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 43-37-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-37-04. Eligibility for licensure.
To be eligible for licensure by the board as an audiologist, speech-language pathologist, or
speech-language pathology assistant, an applicant shall meet all the following requirements:
1. Be of good moral character.
2. Possess an appropriate degree from an educational institution recognized by the board.
a. An applicant for a speech-language pathologist license must possess at least a master's
degree in speech-language pathology.
b. An applicant for an audiologist license must possess at least a doctorate degree in
audiology.
c. An applicant for a speech-language pathology assistant license must possess at least
aone hundred hours of supervised clinical experience or fieldwork and:
(1) A certificate of completion for speech-language pathology paraprofessionals issued
by the superintendent of public instruction prior to Augus t 1, 2026 ;
(2) A bachelor's degree in speech-language pathology or communication disorders; or
(3) A two - year degree in speech-language pathology assistants program or a
bachelor's degree in another field with coursework in the following areas:
(a) Introduction to communication disorders;
(b) Phonetics;
(c) Speech sound disorders;
(d) Language development;

H. B. NO. 1049 - PAGE 2
(e) Language disorders; and
(f) Anatomy and physiology of speech and hearing mechanisms.
d. An applicant for a temporary license must show proof of active licensure within the past
five years in the state or another jurisdiction. Limitations on temporary licensure length
and qualifications to obtain full licensure must be prescribed by rules of the board.
3.2. Submit evidence showing qualifications prescribed by rules of the board.
4.3. Within one year of application an applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist,
speech-language pathology assistant, or audiologist must pass any applicable examination
prescribed by rules adopted by the board.
5.4. Pay the prescribed fee.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 43-37-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-37-13. Disciplinary actions.
1. The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, suspend or revoke a license, or take other
disciplinary action against a licensee if the licensee or applicant for license engaged in
unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes:
a. Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of material
facts.
b. Engaging in unprofessional conduct, as defined by the rules adopted by the board, or
violating the code of ethics adopted by the board by rule.
c. Being convicted of an offense if the acts for which that individual is convicted are
determined by the board to have a direct bearing on that applicant's or licensee's ability
to serve the public in the capacity of a speech-language pathologist, speech-language
pathology assistant, or audiologist; or the board determines that applicant or licensee,
following conviction of any other offense, is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section
12.1-33-02.1.
d. Violating an order or rule adopted by the board.
e. Violating this chapter.
f. Receiving remuneration of any kind from the sale of any type of hearing aid, unless
licensed under chapter 43-33.
2. When conducting an investigation of an alleged violation of this chapter, the board may
subpoena and examine records, including client or patient records, and may copy,
photograph, or take samples of the records. The board may require a licensee to give
statements under oath, submit to a physical or psychological examination, or both if the board
reasonably believes an examination is in the best interests of the public. The client and patient
records released to the board are not public records.
3. One year from the date of revocation of a license, the licensee may make application to the
board for reinstatement. The board may accept or reject an application for reinstatement or
may require an examination for reinstatement.

H. B. NO. 1049 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1049.
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 13 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State